Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-210
Trade name; application
for registration; requirements; Secretary of State.

(1) Subject
to the limitations set forth in sections 87-208 to 87-219.01, any person who
adopts a trade name for use in this state may file in the office of the Secretary
of State on a form furnished by the Secretary of State an application, in
duplicate, for registration of the trade name setting forth, but not limited
to, the following information:

(a) The name and street address of the applicant for registration and, if a corporation or other type of business entity,
the state of incorporation or
organization;

(b) The trade name sought to be registered;

(c) The general nature of the business in fact conducted by the applicant;

(d) The length of time during which the trade name has been used in
this state;

(e) The signature of the applicant; and

(f) A filing fee of one hundred dollars.

(2) Upon compliance by the applicant with the requirements of sections
87-208 to 87-219.01, the Secretary of State shall return the duplicate copy
stamped with the date of filing to the applicant or the representative submitting
the applications for filing.

Laws 1967, c. 628, § 3, p. 2100;

Laws 1971, LB 486, § 3;

Laws 1975, LB 95, § 9;

Laws 1982, LB 928, § 78;

Laws 1997, LB 453, § 8;

Laws 2005, LB 450, § 1;

Laws 2011, LB462, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB886, § 4.